Hawaii statutes.
[§613-3] Board of advisors. (a) A
board of advisors of the center for alternative dispute resolution, consisting
of nine members, shall be appointed by the chief justice. The board shall:

(1) Foster greater understanding of the center and
its purpose by government agencies and by the general public;

(2) Assist the center in disseminating information
about the uses, applications, and advantages of alternative dispute resolution;
and

(3) Strengthen the acceptance and utilization of
alternative dispute resolution by government agencies and the public.

(b) The board of advisors shall include two
representatives from the executive branch, two from the legal community, two
from the Hawaii state association of counties, and three from the public at
large. The board shall meet from time to time to review the center's work and
to advise the chief justice and staff of the center regarding the use of
alternative dispute resolution methods for matters involving or affecting
government agencies and the general public. The board of advisors may add ex
officio members as they deem beneficial or desirable to help achieve the
center's purposes. All members of the board shall serve without pay. [L 1989,
c 346, pt of §2; am L 1991, c 131, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next